Utah statutes.
77-19-206.   Expenses -- Allocation.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Corrections shall each pay 1/2 of the costs of any examination of the inmate conducted pursuant to Sections 77-19-204 and 77-19-205 to determine if an inmate is competent to be executed.

